Journal Artificial Intelligence Research 53 (2015) 779-824

Submitted 05/15; published 08/15

Belief Change Uncertain Action Histories
Aaron Hunter

aaron hunter@bcit.ca

British Columbia Institute Technology
Burnaby, BC, Canada

James P. Delgrande

jim@cs.sfu.ca

Simon Fraser University
Burnaby, BC, Canada

Abstract
consider iterated belief change occurs following alternating sequence
actions observations. instant, agent beliefs actions
occurred well beliefs resulting state world. represent
problems sequence ranking functions, agent assigns quantitative plausibility
value every action every state point time. resulting formalism able
represent fallible belief, erroneous perception, exogenous actions, failed actions.
illustrate framework generalization several existing approaches belief
change, appropriately captures non-elementary interaction belief update
belief revision.

1. Introduction
Many formal approaches introduced reasoning belief change context actions observations (Jin & Thielscher, 2004; Shapiro, Pagnucco, Lesperance,
& Levesque, 2011; Delgrande & Levesque, 2012). general, underlying assumption
agents perform belief update following actions belief revision following observations. Existing formalisms, part, treated actions observations
independently, little explicit discussion interaction two.
paper, consider belief change occurs due alternating sequence actions
observations. interested action domains agent may erroneous
beliefs, state world well action history.
Let K denote beliefs agent, given set possible worlds. 1 n,
let Ai denote action let Oi denote observation. Informally, interested
sequences form
K A1 O1
(1)
update operator revision operator. interpretation
expression flexible actions may understood represent actions executed
particular agent, may exogenous. Note sequences may contain
conflicting information. example, observation may possible following
actions A1 , . . . , . case, two options.
1. Reject .
2. Accept , modify A1 , . . . , .
c
2015
AI Access Foundation. rights reserved.

fiHunter & Delgrande

order determine option preferable specific problem, agent needs
able compare plausibility plausibility Ai .
Expressions form (1) previously addressed, assumption
ontic action histories infallible recent observations take precedence older observations (Hunter & Delgrande, 2011). Clearly, action domains
assumptions reasonable. paper, propose flexible approach
actions observations represented Spohn-style ranking functions.
take approach gives uniform treatment plausibility beliefs, observations, actions. presented conflicting information, agent simply
compare relative plausibility action observation; uniform representation
events makes straightforward determine plausible sequence. Moreover, quantitative plausibility values, encode variety distinct scenarios
manipulating magnitudes plausibility values alternative events.
paper makes several contributions existing work epistemic action effects.
main contribution formal mechanism reasoning incorrect weakly held
beliefs related action histories. Existing formalisms generally unable compare
plausibility action occurrence plausibility state world.
problem because, practical reasoning problems, agents often put position
either believe certain fact holds believe action
occurred. using formal tool represent beliefs actions states,
explicitly address manner prior action occurrences postulated retracted
response new observations.
second contribution work flexible treatment weak unreliable observations. revision operators incorporate new observation, obvious
desirable feature many reasoning domains. many cases, preferable
discard unreliable observation conflicts current, strongly held beliefs. However,
approach simply allow unreliable observation discarded. Since
use ranking functions represent observations, observation includes plausible
alternatives. such, observation actually provide evidence several different
states, differing degrees. see useful representing observations
states similar appearance. Similarly, ranking functions give natural representation addititive evidence, form observations must occur several times
changing agents beliefs.
formulate results simple transition system framework makes
treatment action effects explicit easy compare elaborate action
formalisms. However, fundamental approach dealing uncertainty
actually require transition systems used action effects. intend
methodology described compete alternative formalisms representing
epistemic action effects; rather, provide high-level approach dealing uncertain
action histories focuses specifically interaction actions observations.
significant feature work demonstrates single representation
plausibility used model iterated beliefs actions states simultaneously;
basic approach could employed action formalisms. practical level,
demonstrate utility work giving series examples involving belief change
relative weight given actions observations varies. suggest
780

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

work advances existing work reasoning epistemic action effects provide
flexible, elaboration tolerant approach capturing several different kinds belief change
occur uncertainty action occurrences. Note paper
extended version work presented Hunter Delgrande (2006).
proceed follows. Section 2, introduce formal preliminaries.
define general class plausibility functions Section 3, show sequence
plausibility functions used represent uncertain sequence actions
observations. refer sequence graded world view, demonstrate
agents beliefs event histories captured graded world views
taking aggregates constituent plausibility functions. Section 4, demonstrate
graded world views seen epistemic states, use basic framework
define belief change domains involving uncertainty actions observations
occurred. compare approach related work Section 5,
discuss limitations advantages Section 6. Section 7, offer concluding
remarks.

2. Preliminaries
section, introduce standard formal machinery modelling belief change,
reasoning action effects. introduce simple motivating example
illustrate sort problem would address.
2.1 Belief Revision
Belief revision refers process agent incorporates new information along
pre-existing beliefs. influential approach belief revision AGM
approach (Alchourron, Gardenfors, & Makinson, 1985). Let F denote finite set fluent
symbols, represent binary properties world may change time.
example, may fluent symbol Raining F true case raining.
state propositional interpretation F, indicating fluents true
false. AGM approach belief revision, beliefs agent represented
belief set, deductively closed set formulas F. Since F finite,
equivalently define beliefs agent represented single formula.
Informally, belief revision operator function takes belief set formula revision input returns new formula represents new belief set
incorporating . AGM revision operator binary function satisfies AGM
postulates. following reformulation AGM postulates due Katsuno
Mendelzon (1991). postulates, denotes logical equivalence.
[R1]
[R2]
[R3]
[R4]
[R5]
[R6]

implies .
satisfiable, .
satisfiable, satisfiable.
1 2 1 2 , 1 1 2 2 .
( ) implies ( ).
( ) satisfiable, ( ) implies ( ) .

781

fiHunter & Delgrande

class AGM revision operators captured semantically introducing
formal notion plausibility. particular agent, say state world
plausible another state s0 agent likely abandon belief
s0 presented new information. turns every AGM revision operator
characterized class plausibility orderings set states.
proved several different representations plausibility, including total pre-orders
states (Katsuno & Mendelzon, 1991), systems spheres (Grove, 1988), ordinal
conditional functions (Spohn, 1988).
belief state set states, informally set states agent considers
possible. observation set states, informally represents peice
information agent receives provides evidence actual state .
paper, primarily interested belief change process states rather
formulas; clear AGM approach equivalently defined belief states.
restricted set fluents set actions finite,
really convenience discussing examples. formal model based
transition systems ranking functions sets. would certainly possible
define transition relations ranking functions infinite sets. Since definition
aggregate general, would introduce formal complications. However,
point on, maintain restriction finite domains order simplify
discussion.
2.2 Transition Systems
interested action domains described supplementing set F
fluent symbols finite set action symbols transition system describing
effects actions (Gelfond & Lifschitz, 1998). pair (F, A) called action signature.
defined state interpretation F, often convenient
identify state set fluent symbols true s. use convention
following definition, throughout rest paper.
Definition 1 transition system pair hS, Ri 2F , R S.
restrict attention deterministic transition systems, i.e. assume hs, A, s0 R
hs, A, s00 R implies s0 = s00 . assume always contains distinguished
null action symbol denoted .
Belief update belief change occurs agent becomes aware change
state world. Note distinct process belief revision,
typically understood capture belief change occurs agent obtained new information unchanged world. One highly influential approach
belief update Katsuno-Mendelzon approach (Katsuno & Mendelzon, 1992),
superficially similar AGM revision new information incorporated
encoded propositional formula. contrast, paper, define update
respect action effects given underlying transition system. words,
define belief update operators take belief state action input, return
new belief state represents agents new beliefs action executed.
782

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

Definition 2 Let = hS, Ri transition system. update function : 2S 2S
given = {s | hs0 , A, si R s0 }.
remark notion belief change called belief progression action
progression. Note possible general case result update
empty, case transition system include outgoing edge labelled
state . order avoid problem, often convenient restrict attention
transition systems every action outcome every state. practice,
achieved assuming self-loop action state outcome
state given.
2.3 Belief Evolution
previous work, introduced so-called belief evolution operators reason alternating sequences updates revisions (Hunter & Delgrande, 2011). belief evolution
operator defined respect fixed AGM revision operator fixed update
operator . action observation , let 1 (A) denote set
{s} . Note set may empty. belief evolution operator defined
that, belief state ,
hA, = ( 1 (A)) A.
complete definition actually defines belief change sequence actions
observations; details definition required present. important
point way observation incorporated depends preceding actions.
intuition behind belief evolution final state must possible effect
recently executed action A. intuition satisfied original definition
revising initial belief set prior computing effects A. result, belief evolution
operators non-Markovian character; observation incorporated
considering current state world. Instead, agent incorporates new observation
looking back original state together complete history actions. However,
operation understood Markovian manner allow current belief
state include representation states ruled based
actions previously occurred. manner, define Markovian form
belief revision equivalent belief evolution (Hunter, 2014).
Belief evolution provides reasonable model problems Moores litmus paper
problem (Moore, 1985). problem, agent dips piece litmus paper beaker
determine beaker contains acid base. Hence, agent performing
action first observing results. seems, however, observed results
affect agents initial belief state. is, litmus paper turns red,
agent likely conclude beaker contained acid even dipping.
Belief evolution operators satisfy following properties. properties, A,
denotes sequence action symbols indeterminate length, 2F denotes set
states F. symbols range 2F , though think
belief state think observation. Following standard convention
postulates, implicitly quantify universally variables.
783

fiHunter & Delgrande

1. (2F A) 6= , ( A)
2. (2F A) = , ( A) =
3. ( A) ( A)
4. ( A) 6= , ( A) ( A)
5. ( A) 2F
Informally, properties assert agent respect history actions executed incorporating new observation. Note assuming AGM
revision operator, would appear make properties (1) (3) trivial. However,
included properties belief evolution emphasize fact actions
preceding obervation need considered cases revision occurs (Hunter
& Delgrande, 2011).
One main limitations belief evolution possible represent
erroneous action histories; assumed action history always correct.
reasonable assumption action domains single agent executing actions
fail. However, exogenous failed actions permitted, assumption
difficult support. general, agent may incorrect beliefs actions
occurred past. One aims paper generalize previous work
allow erroneous action histories.
2.4 Motivating Example
introduce common-sense example agent needs compare plausibility
certain actions plausibility observations. return example
periodically introduce formal machinery.
Consider simple action domain involving four agents: Bob, Alice, Eve, Trent. Bob
places chocolate chip cookie desk leaves room; believes one
likely eat cookie gone. Time 1, Bob knows Alice desk.
Time 2, Bob knows Eve desk. Eve leaves desk, Trent comes
tells Bob bite taken cookie.
Given preceding information, Bob draw three reasonable conclusions: Alice
bit cookie, Eve bit cookie, Trent gave poor information. Bob
additional information world, conclusion equally plausible. However,
suppose Bob additional information. particular, suppose
Alice close friend Bob shared cookies past. Moreover, suppose
Bob believes Trent always honest. Bobs additional information Alice
Trent provides sufficient basis determining three possible conclusions
plausible.
Informally, prior Trents report, Bob believes cookie unbitten
earlier points time. Trent tells cookie bitten, must determine
plausible world history consistent information. case, plausible
solution conclude Alice bit cookie. Note conclusion requires Bob
alter subjective view action history. non-monotonic character
784

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

belief change context, Bob may forced postulate retract actions
time response new observations. consequences changing action history
determined underlying transition system. order represent kind
reasoning, need able compare plausibility action occurrences different
points time.
example illustrates kind action scenario would capture,
requires agent determine plausible history given priori
notion plausibility actions observations. instance, intuitively clear
problem resolved without comparing plausibility Trents report
accurate versus plausibility Alice biting cookie. addressing issue
straightforward manner, demonstrate existing actions formalisms extended
employed handle similar situations.
possibly one contentious issue discussion example. information provided Trent really observation usual sense word; instead,
report information external source. However, sections follow,
treat reports observations manner. Specifically, capture
ranking function states indicates states supported
observation/report degree. course, reality, observations reports
quite different manner report incorporated depends trust
reporting agent. relationship trust belief change topic current
interest, generally handled introducing extra formal machinery encode
trust held another agent (Lorini, Jiang, & Perrussel, 2014; Hunter & Booth, 2015).
would certainly possible follow approach present paper, using distinct
formal tools capture trust phenomenon distinct perceived accuracy
sensing. However, mathematically, would end single ranking
states nevertheless. such, present paper, convenient represent reported information single combined ranking captures final plausibility
attached state based considerations agent might make.

3. Ranking Functions Actions States
approach presented paper based simple notion: agent uncertain
action observation, resolving uncertainty generally involves comparing
relative likelihood possible alternatives. work distinguished fact
use sequences ranking functions represent uncertainty actions states.
see sequences ranking functions capture many natural reasoning problems.
developing high-level representations problems, see notion
magnitude likelihood useful reasoning belief change uncertain action
histories. allows us compare work existing formalisms reasoning
epistemic action effects, particularly representation uncertainty
limited orderings states. fundamental goal demonstrate that,
cases, sequences quantitative plausibility orderings expressive advantage
significant perspective knowledge representation. aim develop
approach high-level, manner easily translated action
formalisms.
785

fiHunter & Delgrande

3.1 Plausibility Functions
interested action domains agents beliefs action history may
incorrect. context, action believed executed given point
time represented total pre-order possible actions. minimal elements
pre-order represent actions likely executed, moving higher
ordering gives increasingly implausible possibilities. Representing actions
manner allows agent determine plausible alternative actions face conflicting
evidence. Similarly, agent needs mechanism ordering states order represent
fallible observations fallible beliefs. Moreover, would able compare
orderings actions orderings states. One natural way create mutually
comparable orderings assigning quantitative plausibility values every action
state every point time. Towards end, define plausibility functions.
Definition 3 Let X non-empty set. plausibility function X function
r : X N.
r plausibility function r(x) r(y), say x least plausible
y. interested plausibility functions finite sets, always
non-empty set minimally ranked elements.
Plausibility functions inspired Spohns ordinal conditional functions (Spohn,
1988), important differences. First, allow plausibility functions
arbitrary set X, rather restricting attention propositional interpretations.
allows us treat actions manner treat observations. Another
important difference ordinal conditional functions must always assign rank 0
non-empty subset elements domain. Plausibility functions restricted
manner; minimal rank given plausibility function may greater 0.
defined plausibility functions manner interested taking sums
plausibility functions, need ensure sums define plausibility
functions.
remark Darwiche Pearl consider ranking functions necessarily assign rank 0 states (Darwiche & Pearl, 1997). However, Darwiche Pearl
define belief state associated r set states assigned rank 0.
convention, ranking functions never assign rank 0 associated
empty belief state. contrast, associate non-empty belief state every plausibility
function.
introduce useful terminology notation. Let r plausibility function
X. minimum maximum values obtained r denoted minr maxr ,
respectively. define Bel(r) set {s | r(s) = minr }. notation intended
suggest Bel(r) set actions states believed. clear,
say state believed, mean far agent concerned, actual world
could described s. hand, say action believed,
mean agent views action executed. Note minr always
defined, non-empty set natural numbers minimum element.
hand, maxr guaranteed defined X finite. However,
concerned plausibility functions states actions; finite sets
according original definitions.
786

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

X, define r() minimum value obtained r .
degree strength plausibility function r least n minr +n = r(s)
6 Bel(r). Hence, degree strength r span plausibility
minimally ranked elements non-minimally ranked elements. r degree
strength n, means every 6 Bel(r) plausibility value least n
higher r(Bel(r)). two natural interpretations degree strength
plausibility function r set states. think r initial epistemic state,
degree strength indication strongly believed actual state
Bel(r). think r observation, degree strength measure
subjective reliability r. case X set states, use terms
degree strength degree belief interchangeably.
notion degree strength crucial importance approach. use
total pre-order represent plausibility, really corresponding notion
strength distinguish situation plausible belief strongly held
versus one weakly held. kind distinction essential
sort sequence events; need notion strength belief decide
state action hardest give up. possible represent kind information
ordering empty levels, course. However, focus aggregating
sequences belief states actions. order make simple possible, suggest
better use compact representation given quantitative ranking function
lends naturally arithmetical combinations.
Note Spohn (1988) defines degree strength subset X, rather
degree strength ranking function. definition coincides Spohns definition
identify degree strength r Spohns degree strength set Bel(r).
Hence, use conception degree strength, interested
strength belief minimally ranked elements.
order illustrate application plausibility functions different domains,
continue simple example.
Example (contd) Let F = {B iteT aken} let = {B iteAlice, BiteEve}.
actions effect, namely make fluent B iteT aken become true.
represent problem 3 plausibility functions: a1 , a2 , o2 .
1. a1 plausibility function actions Time 1
2. a2 plausibility function actions Time 2
3. o2 plausibility function states Time 2
Informally, function obtain minimum value event Bob considers
plausible given point time. Since Bob initially believes one
eat cookie, a1 a2 obtain minimum value null action . Trents
report cookie bitten Time 2 represented plausibility function
states, defining o2 minimum set worlds cookie bite
it. Note generally treat reported information manner; degree
strength report indication trust agent providing report.
787

fiHunter & Delgrande

additional soft constraints Bobs relationships used determine magnitude
values event. Define a1 a2 values following table.
a1
a2


0
0

B iteAlice
1
10

B iteEve
10
3

columns table give plausibilities action time. particular,
a1 encodes plausibility occurs 0, whereas plausibility B iteAlice
B iteEve 1 10, respectively. degree strength a1 1, whereas degree
strength a2 3. fact Alice likely bite cookie represented
assigning low plausibility value B iteAlice Time 1.
define o2 follows, give plausibility values states time 2.
o2


9

{B iteT aken}
0

Hence, observation {B iteT aken} assigned minimum plausibility value,
alternative observation assigned high plausibility value. degree
strength o2 9. reflects fact Trents report understood stronger
assumption Alice Eve bite cookie.
Note degree strength a1 less degree strength a2 o2 .
gives indication Bob comparatively less confidence beliefs
action Time 1.
Note that, example, explicitly referred points time. not,
however, include formal representation time framework; reference
time interpreted informal explanatory device. concerned
reasoning scenarios involve sequences actions action instantanenous, actions executed consecutively. Nevertheless, since allow observations
following null actions, imagine actions executed accordance
bounded global clock allows one action per tick.
3.2 Graded World Views
define graded world view alternating sequence plausibility functions
2F plausibility functions A. Hence, time i, use plausibility function
2F represent agents beliefs state world use plausibility
function represent agents beliefs action occurs. Informally,
graded world view represents agents subjective view evolution world
context imperfectly known action histories. rationale behind using sequence
ranking functions eventually make possible compare likelihood actions
observations different points sequence, arrive plausible sequence
events. following formal definition.
Definition 4 graded world view length n (2n + 1)-tuple
hOBS0 , ACT1 , OBS1 , . . . , ACTn , OBSn
788

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

OBSi plausibility function 2F ACTi plausibility function
A.
time i, plausible actions minimally ranked actions ACTi
plausible states minimally ranked states OBSi . take OBS0 represent initial belief state, subsequent OBSi represent new observation.
ACT = hACT1 , . . . , ACTn OBS = hOBS0 , . . . , OBSn i, write hACT, OBSi
shorthand graded world view hOBS0 , ACT1 , OBS1 , . . . , ACTn , OBSn i. Informally, graded world view represents agents subjective view history actions
observations.
remark briefly intuition behind graded world views. interested
action domains involving actions partially observable fallible. However,
moment consider failed actions; address issue briefly 4.6.
plausibility action represents agents confidence successfully executed
given instant. Hence, lowest plausibility values assigned actions
agent executed, actions agent observed directly. Higher plausibility
values assigned exogenous actions assumed unlikely, action
occurrences believed based external reports. 3.4, provide
additional motivation plausibility values illustrating correspondence subjective
probability functions.
Note graded world views essentially represent initial belief state observation time 0. underlying assumption graded world view initial belief
state different subsequent observation; reason automatically
prefer initial beliefs new information, reason automatically
disregard initial beliefs given new information. definition graded world view,
used indices manner symmetric order emphasize unique
stature OBS0 . particular, note ACT0 definition. simple
notational convention intended highlight fact OBS0 slightly different
stature informal level.
3.3 Aggregate Plausibility Functions
Given graded world view hACT, OBSi, would able determine
plausible history world. formally define notion history transition
system.
Definition 5 Let = hS, Ri transition system. history length n tuple
hs0 , A1 , . . . , , sn i:
1. si S,
2. Ai A,
3. hsi , Ai+1 , si+1 R.
Let HISTn denote set histories length n.
Note HISTn (A S)n . Ideally, would use graded world views
assign plausibility values histories. However, graded world view provide
789

fiHunter & Delgrande

sufficient information define unique plausibility function histories. example,
graded world view indicate relative weight recent information versus initial
information. order determine plausible history, need mechanism
combining sequence plausibility functions.
Although graded world view define unique plausibility function histories, define general notion consistency graded world views plausibility functions histories. Let r0 , . . . , rn plausibility functions X0 , . . . , Xn ,
respectively. Let r plausibility function X0 Xn . say r consistent
hr0 , . . . , rn if, every every xi , x0i Xi
ri (xi ) < ri (x0i )

r(hx0 , . . . , xi , . . . , xn i) < r(hx0 , . . . , x0i , . . . , xn i)
r consistent hACT, OBSi case r increases monotonically respect
component hACT, OBSi. plausibility function r consistent
hACT, OBSi provides potential candidate ranking histories.
Define aggregate plausibility function function maps every graded world
view length n plausibility function HISTn . interested aggregate
plausibility functions output always consistent input. Hence,
say aggregate plausibility function agg admissible if, every hACT, OBSi,
function agg(hACT, OBSi) consistent hACT, OBSi.
provide examples. Note aggregate plausibility functions return function
value; specify behaviour aggregate specifying plausibility value
pair consisting graded world view history. Let h = hs0 , A1 , . . . , , sn i.
One admissible aggregate obtained taking sum plausibility values.
sum(hACT, OBSi)(h) =

n
X

ACTi (Ai ) +

i=1

n
X

OBSi (si )

i=0

weighted sum used reflect relative importance different time points.
i, let bi positive integer.
sums (hACT, OBSi)(h) =

n
X

ACTi (Ai ) +

i=1

n
X

bi OBSi (si ).

i=0

setting bi = 2i , aggregate function sums used represent strict preference
recent observations. standard assumption many approaches belief revision.
could add similar weight action histories well, would give another
distinct aggregate. functions sum sums two simple examples; many
examples defined specifying aggregate functions increase monotonically
component.
return cookie example illustrate reasoning involved captured
graded world views aggregate plausibility functions.
Example (contd) already defined plausibility functions a1 , a2 o2 . order
give complete graded world view, need define two plausibility functions
790

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

states. particular, need give plausibility function o0 representing Bobs initial
beliefs need give plausibility function o1 representing null observation
Bob makes Time 1.
First, reiterate description a1 a2 following table.

a1
a2


0
0

B iteAlice
1
10

B iteEve
10
3

fact Alice likely bite cookie represented assigning lower
plausibility value B iteAlice Time 1.
plausibility function o0 assign minimum value state cookie
unbitten. plausibility function o1 assign value every state.
plausibility function o2 (given previously) represents Trents report cookie
bitten. noted previously, treat reported information observation, use
degree strength reported information indication reliability
source. case, degree strength o2 indication trust Trent. define
o0 , o1 , o2 next table.

o0
o1
o2


0
0
9

{B iteT aken}
9
0
0

Note degree strength o2 higher degree strength a1 a2 .
reflects fact Trents report understood supersede assumption
Alice Eve bite cookie. Graded world views defined precisely
kind comparison action plausibilities state plausibilities.
use aggregate function sum, interested finding minimal sum
plausibilities ho0 , a1 , o1 , a2 , o2 i. inspection, find minimum plausibility
obtained following history:
h = h, B iteAlice, B iteT aken, , B iteT akeni.
history represents sequence events Alice bites cookie time 1.
Intuitively, correct solution: given choice Alice Eve, Bob believes
Alice plausible culprit.
remark graded world views bear resemblance generalized belief change
framework proposed Liberatore Schaerf (2000). However, Liberatore-Schaerf
approach associates penalty state change, minimized determining
plausible models. such, difficult represent problems non-null actions
strictly plausible null actions. contrast, graded world views implicit
preference null actions. Moreover, approach differs allow actions
conditional effects given transition system.
791

fiHunter & Delgrande

3.4 Subjective Probabilities
One issue arises definition graded world view fact clear
plausibility values assigned practical problems. address problem
illustrating correspondence plausibility functions probability functions.
simplify discussion restricting attention rational-valued probability functions
follows.
Definition 6 Let X non-empty set. probability function X function
P r : X Q
x X, 0 P r(x) 1
P

xX P r(x) = 1.
need axioms probability theory present purposes.
common-sense level, clear means say action occurred time
probability p. contrast, problem plausibility values obvious
sense scale; difficult assign numerical plausibility values, numbers
clear meaning. illustrate probability functions translated uniformly
plausibility functions, thereby giving sense scale meaning plausibility values.
Let P r probability function finite set X. Let Q denote least common
denominator rational numbers pq P r(x) = pq x X. Define
plausibility function r follows.
1. P r(x) minimal, set r(x) = Q.
2. Otherwise, P r(x) =

p
Q,

set r(x) = Q p.

Hence, every probability function translated plausibility function.
Example (contd) Consider following probability functions cookie example.

P ra1
P ra2


.5
.5

B iteAlice
.45
.15

B iteEve
.05
.35


.9
.5
.1

P ro0
P ro1
P ro2

{B iteT aken}
.1
.5
.9

corresponding plausibility functions given following tables.

a01
a02


10
10

B iteAlice
11
20

B iteEve
20
13

o00
o01
o02


1
2
10

{B iteT aken}
10
2
1

easy see plausibility functions obtained plausibility
functions given earlier adding constant value. 4.2, illustrate adding
constant manner affect class minimally ranked histories.
Connecting plausibility functions subjective probabilities provides justification use aggregate function sum. particular, assume subjective
792

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

probability functions independent, probability given sequence events
determined taking product. cookie example, compare probability
Alice biting cookie versus Eve biting cookie:
1. P r(h, B iteAlice, B iteT aken, , B iteT akeni)
= .9 .45 .5 .5 .9 = .091125
2. P r(h, , , B iteEve, B iteT akeni)
= .9 .5 .5 .35 .9 = .070875
easy check history Alice bites cookie actually probable history. So, example, minimally ranked history according aggregate
function sum probable history according sequence probability
functions. general property translation: maximizing probability independent probability functions corresponds minimizing sum plausibility values.
follows simply fact probable events assigned minimal plausibility values, fact summation natural numbers increasing
function, whereas multiplication fractions less 1 decreasing.
correspondence descibed section relies assumption sequences
actions independent. worth noting, however, often case
practice. Instead, often case actions occur sequences clear
dependence individual actions. However, concern present.
reason considering probability functions provide intuition motivation
way plausibility values assigned.
3.5 Summation Convention
order ground discussion, useful choose fixed aggregate function assigning plausibility values histories. such, unless otherwise indicated, assume
plausibility values assigned histories aggregate function sum. Although
approach combining plausibility functions, provides simple admissible aggregate function appropriate many cases. particular, saw
previous section sum appropriate domains plausibility functions
obtained independent subjective probabilities.
introduce notation simplify results next sections.
Recall sum(hACT, OBSi) plausibility function histories. underlying
graded world view clear context, write plaus(h) shorthand
sum(hACT, OBSi)(h).
useful introduce operator maps graded world view plausible
histories.
Definition 7 Let W Vn denote set graded world views length n fixed action
signature. Define : W Vn 2HISTn follows:
(hACT, OBSi) = {h | plaus(h) plaus(g) g HISTn }.
following obvious equivalence
(hACT, OBSi) = Bel(sum(hACT, OBSi)).
793

fiHunter & Delgrande

useful use plaus define plausibility function states.
Definition 8 Let hACT, OBSi graded world view. state s, define
plaus state(hACT, OBSi)(s)
least n plaus(hACT, OBSi)(h) = n history h final state
s.
plausibility state rank plausible history ending s.
underlying graded world view clear context, simply write plaus state(s)
plausibility state s. extend operator Bel() graded world views
defining Bel(hACT, OBSi) Bel(plaus state(hACT, OBSi)). Hence, Bel takes
graded world view argument returns plausible set terminal states.
3.6 Uniform Representation
considering applications formal results, briefly discuss novel
significant features approach. notion plausibility relation theory
change explored extensively literature. Work nonmonotonic consequence
operators, example, informed notions preferred models (Kraus, Lehmann,
& Magidor, 1990) conditional knowledge (Lehmann & Magidor, 1992).
great deal research different representations plausibility, ranging orderings (Baltag & Smets, 2006, 2008; Britz & Varzinczak, 2013), quantitative approaches
possibility (Benferhat, Dubois, & Prade, 1999), variations probabilistic models
(Friedman & Halpern, 2001). take moment position work context.
stated several times, sets work apart apply
notion plausibility uniformly states actions. contrasts existing
work, model plausibility used representing initial beliefs, actions
handled different formal machinery. many cases, actions atomic; belief
change due action concerned complicated plausibility structure changes
response distinct action occurence.
model, action occurrence another plausibility function. several
advantages, show next sections. First, allows us easily compare
strength belief state strength belief action occurence. example,
believe lamp believe toggled switch: believe?
Situations form common, require comparison two different
forms likelihood. general, natural logical aparatus help resolve
problem; need extra-logical information belief stronger, belief
state belief action. natural intuition actually need
given rankings make determination; exactly here.
second advantage using uniform representation plausibility actions
allows us consider alternative actions. Looking literature belief change
preferential models, clear actually need orderings states order
perform many kinds reasoning. reason need orderings need
able specify best alternatives things believed true. argue
true actions. find action occur, need
794

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

mechanism determining next best alternative. see next
section many practical examples important, examples
captured straightforward way plausibility functions.
tempting look model try position context
alternative models plausibility, argue best way look
work. fact, could propose approach similar one paper based
sequences probability functions suitable aggregates. fact using
Spohn-style ranking functions particular important point.
important using measure plausibility uniformly observations
actions, plausibility measure feature differences plausibility
magnitude. allows us determine alternatives current beliefs
states actions abandoned, appeal single notion
magnitude determine notion minimal change.

4. Using Graded World Views
section, consider basic approach one use try find
minimally ranked history.
4.1 Pointwise Minima
Let W = hACT, OBSi graded world view
ACT = hACT1 , . . . , ACTn

OBS = hOBS0 , . . . , OBSn i.
easiest way determine minimally ranked history simply take plausible
actions plausible worlds point time. following definition makes
notion precise.
Definition 9 Given history h = hs0 , A1 , . . . , , sn i, say h pointwise minimum
hACT, OBSi if, i,
1. A, ACTi (Ai ) ACTi (A),
2. 2F , OBSi (si ) OBSi (s).
following proposition states that, graded world view pointwise minima,
plausible histories.
Proposition 1 Let W = hACT, OBSi graded world view let set
pointwise minima W . 6= , (W ) = .
Proof sufficient note that, h , plaus(h) plaus(g) histories g.
Note, however, histories restricted world must outcome
preceding action. such, possible graded world view pointwise
minimum. preceding proposition starts assumption set
795

fiHunter & Delgrande

pointwise minima non-empty. cases pointwise minima,
still minimally plausible histories.
Finding pointwise minima easy general case.
Proposition 2 Determining graded world view pointwise minimum N P complete.
Proof Given history, clear checking pointwise minimum
done linear time; problem lies N P . Assume fixed set F fluent symbols.
Let W = hACT, OBSi OBS length 2|F| , assume OBSi obtains
minimum distinct interpretation F. pointwise minimum W correspond
Hamiltonian path underlying transition system. result follows since finding
Hamiltonian path NP-complete.
fact already intractable find pointwise minimum suggests finding
minimal histories complicated aggregate function likely computationally
difficult. major concern present purposes however, view graded
world views high-level tool capture variety belief change scenarios. one
interested modelling concrete action domains, important choose aggregate
functions well understood computationally easy minimize.
4.2 Equivalence
Clearly possible two distinct graded world views set minimally
ranked world histories. fact, possible two distinct graded world views induce
preference ordering histories. section, define natural equivalence
relation graded world views eye towards categorical representations. start
defining relation plausibility functions.
Definition 10 Let r1 r2 plausibility functions set X. say r1
= r2
if, every x, X,
r1 (x) r1 (y) = r2 (x) r2 (y).
easy verify following:
= equivalence relation, r1 r2 degree
strength, r1
r
implies
Bel(r1 ) = Bel(r2 ). Essentially, difference
= 2
equivalent plausibility functions minimum value; make idea
precise defining notion normalization plausibility functions.
Let r plausibility function. integer z minr , translation r
z plausibility function x 7 r(x) + z. easy prove r
= r0
0
r translation r. define normalization r translation minr .
normalization r unique plausibility function equivalent r obtains
minimum 0.
extend notion equivalence graded world views.
Definition 11 Let W1 W2 graded world views histories fixed action signature given underlying transition system. say W1
= W2 if, every pair
histories g h,
sum(W1 )(g) sum(W1 )(h) = sum(W2 )(g) sum(W2 )(h).
796

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

Unlike plausibility functions, possible construct equivalent pairs graded world
views obtained translations.
following proposition illustrates every graded world view equivalent
graded world view consisting normalized plausibility functions.
Proposition 3 Let hACT, OBSi graded world view. hACT 0 , OBS 0 obtained
normalizing component ACT OBS,
hACT, OBSi
= hACT 0 , OBS 0 i.
Proof
Let g, h histories. ease readability, let plaus1 plaus2 denote
sum(hACT, OBSi) sum(hACT 0 , OBS 0 i), respectively. Hence, plaus1 plaus2
functions histories, obtained minimization total sum. such, plaus1
plaus2 must minimum value, corresponding lowest possible sum
terms. following equalities immediate:
plaus2 (g) plaus2 (h) = plaus1 (g) min plaus1 (h) + min
plaus1

plaus1

= plaus1 (g) plaus1 (h).

Hence, although allow plausibility functions minimum values larger 0
graded world view, always pass equivalent graded world view consisting
normalized plausibility functions. remark, however, graded world view defined
sequence normalized plausibility functions need obtain minimum 0.
case, minimum 0 graded world view pointwise minimum.
important note Proposition 3 holds aggregate plausibility
function sum.
4.3 Representing Belief States
Plausibility functions defined simply pick distinguished set elements
domain. X c integer, let c denote function X set
integers defined follows:

0
c (s) =
c otherwise
c positive integer, c denotes plausibility function elements
plausible, everything else equally implausible. Plausibility functions
form c called simple. X set states, simple plausibility functions
correspond belief states; X set actions, simple plausibility functions pick
actions believed occurred. Using terminology introduced earlier,
say held degree belief c.
c > 0, c actually define plausibility function. However, allowing
negative values leads simple symmetry notation. following proposition,
denotes complement set difference. set states, = 2F .
797

fiHunter & Delgrande

Proposition 4 set positive integer c
c
= c.
Proof Let s, states. definition,

, 6
c
c 6 ,
c (s) c (t) =

0
otherwise.


(c)
c
c (s) c (t) =

0

6 ,
, 6
otherwise.

Clearly, right hand sides equality same.
Suppose
ACT = hACT1 , . . . , ACTn

OBS = hOBS0 , . . . , OBSn
ACTi OBSi simple, maximum plausibility c. means
ACTi OBSi assigns either value 1 value c every element
respective domains. case, essentially belief states plausibility
ordering. case, easy show
hs0 , A1 , . . . , , sn (hACT, OBSi)
cardinality
{Ai | Ai ACTi } {si | si OBSi }
maximal among histories. words, plausible histories
agree hACT, OBSi highest number components. reasonable
approach take trivial case prior ranking states actions.
emphasize special case plausibility functions simple
share degree strength. next section, define belief change
operations terms general concatenation plausibility functions. restrict
plausiblity functions here, get much wider range possible belief
change operations.
4.4 Graded World Views Epistemic States
epistemic state representation agents belief state defines total pre-order
states (Darwiche & Pearl, 1997). t, underlying agent believes
likely actual state world t. current belief
state given set -minimal states. Recall graded world view defines
798

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

plausibility function plaus state states. graded world view clearly defines
ordering states, think graded world view defining epistemic
state. worlds receive minimal rank graded world view worlds
supported reliable observations actions. Using ranking define
plausibility ordering tantamount assuming plausibility completely
determined reliability source reporting occurs.
viewing graded world views epistemic states, define belief change operations
familiar manner. particular, define belief change simple
concatenation operator graded world views. Given sequence plausibility functions
r = hr1 , . . . , rn plausibility function r, let r r denote sequence hr1 , . . . , rn , ri.
Let hACT, OBSi graded world view, let rA plausibility function actions
let rS plausibility function states. Define follows:
hACT, OBSi hrA , rS = hACT rA , OBS rS i.
context initial epistemic state given hACT, OBSi, represents
agents priori beliefs history observed actions states. New actions
observations incorporated simply concatenating new plausibility functions
initial graded world view. new graded world view used define new
ordering histories aggregate function. example, using sum
default aggregate, new ordering immediate. Note new graded world view
obtained manner includes historical information required future belief
change. special case simple concatenation operation, get new approach
update. set X, let 0 denote plausibility function uniformly assigns 0
every element X. identify update hACT, OBSi rA following
operation:
hACT, OBSi hrA , 0i.
define natural approach revision manner. Let null denote
plausibility function assigns plausibility 0 null action , assigns everything
else plausibility larger maximum value obtained sum(hACT, OBSi).
identify revision hACT, OBSi rS following operation:
hACT, OBSi hnull, rS i.
Using plausibility functions represent observations allows us represent natural
problem domains easily represented restrict observations sets
possible worlds. particular, consider action domain observations
varying degrees reliability. domains, agent makes observation
inconsistent current belief state, two factors considered:
strength belief current belief state reliability observation.
obvious conflict arises attempt address factors simultaneously.
example, suppose underlying agent strongly believes possible state
world. suppose agent makes two observations.
1. One observation suggests possible, comes unreliable source.
799

fiHunter & Delgrande

2. Another observation suggests possible, comes reliable
source.
difficult determine appropriate belief change scenario, particularly
strength belief observational reliability treated independently. quantifying
reliability every observation, graded world views make easy resolve kind
issue. remark problems form addressed use
prioritized merging operators (Delgrande, Dubois, & Lang, 2006).
Note asymmetry definition revision update
operator. case update, assume final observation assigns
plausibility every state. symmetric definition single observation would
defined follows:
hACT, OBSi h0, rS i.
However, definition allows arbitrary action occur immediately observation. want assume graded world view hACT, OBSi gives complete picture
world time observation, need assume intermediary
action null. Hence, asymmetry due significant difference actions
observations; asymmetry simply due fact graded world views involve
alternating sequences actions observations, actions occurring first default.
section illustrated graded world view defines epistemic state.
take epistemic state total pre-order states, converse clearly
false: ordering states provide enough information define numerical ranking
functions states. move epistemic states graded world views motivated
kind concern motivates move belief states epistemic states.
particular, belief states AGM revision understood represent minimal
elements ordering states. Hence, belief state provide partial description
ordering, ordering turn provide partial description graded world
view. belief state sufficient single-shot revision, provided ordering implicit
revision operator. However, belief state sufficient need explicitly
reason way plausibility orderings modified. Similarly, orderings states
sufficient reasoning preferences states, sufficient need
explicitly reason action histories. next section, clarify point
practical examples.
4.5 Representing Natural Action Domains
illustrate interesting phenomena represented graded world views.
simplest examples involve graded world views length 1. particular, initially
focus graded world views form
hIN hrA , rS i.
context, represents initial belief state agent, rA represents agents
beliefs action executed, rS represents observed state
world. Previously used OBS0 initial plausibility function states;
change notation emphasize priori initial ordering
800

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

states. clear, , rA , rS plausibility functions. such,
define degree strength each. facilitate exposition, denote degrees
strength deg(IN ), deg(rA ), deg(rS ) respectively. Varying magnitudes
values allows us capture several different underlying assumptions.
1. Fallible initial beliefs: deg(IN ) < deg(rA ) deg(IN ) < deg(rS ).
2. Erroneous perception: deg(rS ) < deg(IN ) deg(rS ) < deg(rA ).
3. Fallible action history: deg(rA ) < deg(IN ) deg(rA ) < deg(rS ).
simple example, suppose agent believes certain lamp initially on,
power switch toggled, agent observes lamp actually still
on. Clearly sequence events consistently believed rational agent.
Manipulating degrees strength , rA rS gives agent mechanism
resolving conflicts. case (1), agent completely certain lamp
initially on. such, easiest way incorporate new information change
initial belief state. contrast, case (2), agent completely certain
lamp still toggling switch. case, since agent confident
lamp initially switch toggled, natural reject observation
believe lamp off. distinction two cases cannot
captured without notion reliability. case (3), agent would resolve conflict
believing attempt toggle power switch failed.
special case degree strength 0 captures important
phenomena. Note plausibility function r degree strength 0 case
constant c r(x) = c x. such, degree 0 indicates every
element domain receives minimal rank. consider informal interpretation
degree 0 plausibility function schematic example.
1. deg(IN ) = 0, every initial state equally plausible. agent
contingent priori beliefs state world.
2. deg(rO ) = 0, rO represents null observation. observation OBS
provide evidence particular state.
3. deg(rA ) = 0, every action equally likely. agent completely ignorant
action occurred, think rA exogenous action
beyond agents control.
relatively crude distinctions, still capture important classes problems.
Roughly speaking, problems addressed thus far captured
plausibility ordering sequences form
A1 1 n
belief state, Ai action symbol, observation.
purpose comparison, remark belief evolution operators defined
Section 2.3 useful problems underlying plausibility ordering
801

fiHunter & Delgrande

given follows, permutation p1 , . . . , pn 1, . . . , n.

A1

..
. p1 p2 pn


contrast, graded world views suitable total pre-order A1 , 1 , . . . , , n .
entire class problems representable graded world views. using
ranking function event, able draw two additional distinctions
represented simple ordering. First, able represent changes plausibility
affect ordering states. useful representing action domains
agent must observe single piece evidence multiple times believing
correct. Second, able represent graded evidence; use term graded evidence
describe situations observation actually supports several different conclusions
different degrees confidence. conclude section two examples illustrating
action domains difficult represent ordering plausibility
events.
Example (Additive Evidence) Bob believes turned lamp office,
completely certain. leaving building, talks first Alice
Eve. Alice tells lamp still on, believe mistaken.
Similarly, Eve tells lamp still on, believe mistaken.
However, Alice Eve tell Bob lamp still on, believe
fact still on.
example easily represented graded world view follows. assume
underlying action signature contains, among others, fluent symbol LampOn
action symbol urnLampOff . underlying transition system defines effects
turning lamp obvious manner. Let denote set states
LampOn true. following plausibility functions define graded world view
represents action domain.
1. OBS0 = 10
2. ACT1 = {T urnLampOff } 3
3. OBS1 = 2
4. ACT2 = 10
5. OBS2 = 2
Note (hOBS0 , ACT1 , OBS1 i) consists histories lamp turned
time 1. However, (hOBS0 , ACT1 , OBS1 , ACT2 , OBS2 i) consists histories
lamp turned time 1. Two observations required make Bob believe
turn lamp off.

Example (Graded Evidence) Bob receives gift estimates worth approximately $7. curious price, tries glance quickly receipt without
802

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

anyone noticing. believes receipt says price $3. far low
believable, Bob concludes must mis-read receipt. Since 3 looks
similar 8, concludes price receipt must actually $8.
represent example, first define ACT1 = 10 Bob believes ontic actions occurred. assume fluent symbols Cost1, Cost2, . . . , Cost9
interpreted represent cost gift. define plausibility function OBS0 representing Bobs initial beliefs.

0 = {Cost7}
1 = {Cost6} = {Cost8}
OBS0 (s) =

3 otherwise
Note Bob initially believes cost $7, comparatively plausible
cost one dollar less. Finally, define plausibility function OBS1 representing
observation receipt.

0 = {Cost3}
1 = {Cost8}
OBS1 (s) =

3 otherwise
Bob believes observed digit likely 3, plausible alternative visually similar digit 8.
Given plausibility functions, plausible state world state
price $8. order draw conclusion, Bob needs observations provide
graded evidence states world needs able weight information
initial beliefs.
preceding examples illustrate natural common-sense reasoning problems agent needs consider aggregate plausibilities sequence actions
observations. Graded world views well-suited reasoning problems.
4.6 Non-deterministic Failed Actions
section, consider actions non-deterministic effects. remark, particular,
fallible actions understood actions non-deterministic effects; fallible
actions actions possible outcomes considered failures.
simplest case, example, failed action might one leaves state world
unchanged. Hence, addressing non-deterministic effects, handling actions
might fail. basic approach following. introduce new machinery
representation non-deterministic actions, demonstrate new
machinery unnecessary use summation determine plausibility histories.
such, reasonably restrict attention deterministic actions proving formal
expressibility results graded world views.
Given non-deterministic transition system = hS, Ri graded world view W ,
clear choose effects action plausible world
histories. problem solved attaching plausibility value possible effects
action (Boutilier, 1995). action state s, let EF F (A, s) denote
803

fiHunter & Delgrande

set states s0 (s, A, s0 ) R. Hence EF F (A, s) set states may
result, given action executed state s.
Definition 12 effect ranking function function maps every action-state pair
(A, s) plausibility function EF F (A, s).
Informally, effect ranking function gives plausibility possible effect
action. instance, want model coin flipping action, corresponding effect
ranking function would constant: outcomes coin flip would considered
equally plausible.
non-deterministic graded world view pair hW, W graded world view
effect ranking function. illustrate example.
Example Consider action domain involving single fluent symbol LampOn indicating
whether certain lamp turned on. two action symbols P ress
hrowP aper respectively representing acts pressing light switch, throwing
ball paper light switch. Informally, throwing ball paper light switch
likely turn lamp. suppose agent reason believe
piece paper thrown lamp and, moreover, lamp turned on.
illustrate non-deterministic graded world views provide representation
problem.
actions non-deterministic effects may cause LampOn become
true, may fail so. define graded world view hACT, OBSi length
1. First, define ACT hrowP aper likely action time 1.

ACT1


10

P ress
2

hrowP aper
1

Next define OBS initially light off, light on.

OBS0
OBS1


10
0

LampOn
0
10

Finally, define effect ranking function represents fact pressing
likely turn light on.

(P ress, {LampOn})
(P ress, )
(T hrowP aper, {LampOn})
(T hrowP aper, )


0
10
9
0

{LampOn}
10
0
0
9

Lines 1 2 table indicate pressing switch likely change
state lamp. Lines 3 4 indicate throwing paper switch likely
804

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

effect, change caused paper ball seen plausible
failed effect button pressed.
preceding example, two possible solutions: either plausible event occurs
unlikely outcome, less plausible event occurs expected outcome.
priori preference given occurrence plausibilities effect plausibilities;
framework flexible enough represent either possibility.
Introducing effect ranking functions makes distinction action occurrences
action effects explicit, turn gives straightforward treatment failed actions. However, need introduce extra machinery order determine
plausible action history. general approach extend definition
aggregate plausibility function: non-deterministic aggregate plausibility function takes
non-deterministic graded world view argument, returns plausibility function
histories. admissible non-deterministic aggregate plausibility function one
increases monotonically respect given graded world view, well given
effect ranking function.
using function sum standard aggregate plausibility function.
natural extension sum non-deterministic graded world views following.
history h = s0 , A1 , . . . , , sn , define
X
sum(hACT, OBSi, )(h) =
OBSi (si ) + ACTi (Ai ) + (Ai , si1 )(si ).


easy see admissible non-deterministic aggregate function. Returning
lamp example, two minimally ranked histories function: one
lamp turned pressing switch one lamp
turned throwing piece paper switch.
remainder section, assume sum default aggregate
function non-deterministic world views. assumption, demonstrate
non-deterministic graded world views translated graded world views
extended action signature.
Let = hS, Ri non-deterministic transition system action signature hA, Fi.
Let hhACT, OBSi, non-deterministic graded world view. extend action
signature new action signature A0 every edge corresponds unique
action symbol. particular, let A0 = {A(s,A,t) | (s, A, t) R}. Let 0 = hS, R0 R0
closure set {hs, A(s,A,t) , ti | s, S}. Suppose ACT = ACT1 , . . . , ACTn .
Define ACT 0 = ACT10 , . . . , ACTn0 where, i, ACTi0 (A(s,A,t) ) = ACTi (A) + (A, s)(t).
Proposition 5 non-deterministic transition system , history
h = s0 , A1 , . . . , , sn
obtains rank hhACT, OBSi,
h0 = s0 , A(s0 ,A1 ,s2 ) , . . . , A(sn1 ,An ,sn ) , sn
obtains hACT 0 , OBSi.
805

fiHunter & Delgrande

Proof plausibility h obtained taking sum
X
OBSi (si ) + ACTi (Ai ) + (Ai , si1 )(si ),


clearly sum taken determine plausibility h0 .
Hence non-deterministic actions failed actions represented graded world
view, simply setting plausibility functions carefully.
remark conceptually interesting distinction lost translation. Informally, distinction action fails occur action
occurs, fails produce expected effect. distinction clear consider
difference failing drop glass ground, dropping glass fails
break hits ground. first case, agent executes drop action
fails occur; perhaps glass sticks agents hand. second case,
glass successfully dropped without breaking. framework, events
represented dropping action null effect. suggest acceptable
treatment, cases sequence actions states identical. such,
cannot distinguish scenarios based definition history. However,
may able distinguish indirectly based values fluents. instance,
location glass going change case successfully dropped.

5. Comparison Related Formalisms
Belief change due actions observations addressed previously literature.
section, consider approach related existing work area.
5.1 Representing Single-Shot Belief Change
focus thus far use graded world views representation
iterated belief change due actions observations, simplest scenario involves
single ontic epistemic action. important, therefore, verify singleshot belief change operators induced graded world view reasonable respect
existing work area. Recall defined graded world views
shorthand notation associated concatenation operations. Based results
section, clear shorthand natural appropriate.
first consider case single ontic action.
Proposition 6 Let hACT, OBSi graded world view. plausibility function r
A,
Bel(hACT, OBSi hr, 0i) = Bel(hACT, OBSi) Bel(r).
Proof Since every action always executable, Bel(hACT, OBSi hr, 0i)
s0 Bel(hACT, OBSi) s0 = Bel(r). Hence
Bel(hACT, OBSi hr, 0i) Bel(hACT, OBSi) Bel(r).
Proposition 6 important primarily interested belief states ontic actions.
Basically, case, graded world views unnecessary. plausible final belief
state determined simply looking belief state associated initial
graded world view.
806

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

consider case single observation. present, primarily interested
comparing expressive power graded world views AGM revision operators.
one sense graded world views clearly expressive AGM
operators. particular, new observation need incorporated agents beliefs
observation come reliable source. demonstrate that,
context single observation, essentially difference graded world
view AGM revision operator. specifically, see belief change
defined concatenating single observation onto graded world view captured
AGM operator, provided observation degree strength higher
fixed threshold.
start proving every plausibility function defines system spheres,
defined Grove (1988). first review definition system spheres. Let ML
denote set consistent, complete theories L. set subsets ML system
spheres centered X X ML , satisfies conditions:
S1. totally ordered
S2. X minimum
S3. ML
S4. formula || =
6 , least sphere c() c() || =
6
U || =
6 implies c() U every U
picture system spheres series concentric circles, innermost circle X.
Let r plausibility function X minimum value minr . n, let r[n]
denote set complete, consistent theories satisfied interpretation
r(I) n.
Proposition 7 Let r plausibility function finite action signature. collection
R = {r[n] | n minr } system spheres centered r[minr ].
Proof Clearly, n, r(n) r(n + 1). Hence R totally ordered .
r[minr ], satisfied r(I) minr . then, n,
satisfied r(I) n. Hence r[minr ] r[n] r[n].
Since action signature finite, finitely many states. Hence
state assigned maximum plausibility, say maxr . Therefore, r[maxr ] set
complete, consistent theories.
Let consistent formula. Since finitely many states, must
state r(s) r(t) . Let n = r(s). Clearly r(n) 6= .
suppose U U 6= . Suppose U = r(m), U set complete,
consistent theories satisfied r(I) m. Since elements U
, follows n. Therefore r[n] U , r[n] least sphere intersecting .
Using result, show single-shot revision graded world views
captured AGM revision operators. make claim precise next proposition.
807

fiHunter & Delgrande

Proposition 8 Let hACT, OBSi graded world view. AGM revision function natural number n that, plausibility function r states
degree strength larger n,
Bel(hACT, OBSi h n, ri) = Bel(hACT, OBSi) Bel(r).
Proof Recall plaus plausibility function histories defined minimizing sums hACT, OBSi, plaus state corresponding plausibility function
final states.
Let n natural number n > plaus(h) every history h. Let r
plausibility function rank n. follows Bel(hACT, OBSih n, ri)
following conditions hold:
1. Bel(r)
2. plaus state(s) minimal among states satisfying 1.
Proposition 7, plaus state defines system spheres centered Bel(plaus state).
follows Groves representation result (Grove, 1988) AGM revision
function that, observation , Bel(plaus state)
following conditions hold:
1.
2. plaus state(s) minimal among states satisfying 1.
Setting = Bel(r) gives desired result.
Proposition 8 illustrates that, single observation, plausible worlds
determined without considering history actions observations. determine
plausible worlds following observation simply abstracting belief state
graded world view, performing AGM revision. easy show converse
true: every AGM revision operator represented graded world view.
precisely, following result.
Proposition 9 Let AGM revision operator let belief state.
graded world view hACT, OBSi Bel(hACT, OBSi) = natural number n
that, every non-empty observation ,
= Bel(hACT, OBSi h n, ri)
r plausibility function states minimal ranked elements
degree larger n.
Proof Groves representation result, captured system spheres S.
Define graded world view hACT, OBSi system spheres given
Proposition 7. Set n n > plaus(h) every history h. result immediate.

Taken together, Propositions 8 9 illustrate graded world views equivalent
808

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

AGM revision restrict attention single observation sufficiently high degree
reliability. Hence, single-shot belief change, full expressive power graded world
views unnecessary. ontic actions observations, define
belief change operations start belief state. correspondence
Nayaks work iterated revision (Nayak, 1994); observation sufficiently
plausible, every state observation ends strictly plausible
every state.
5.2 Representing Conditionalization
Spohn uses ranking functions define different form single-shot belief change called
conditionalization (Spohn, 1988). idea new evidence presented pair
(, m), set states 0; value indication strength
observation . Informally, conditionalization r new function
minimally ranked -worlds receive rank 0 non- worlds shifted m.
section, illustrate conditionalization defined terms graded world
views.
First, define conditionalization formally. Let r plausibility function minr =
0 let subset domain r. Let min() denote minimum value r(s)
. Spohn defines plausibility function r(|) follows:
r(s|) = r(s) min().
call r(s|) -part r. conditionalization r, written r(,m) , following
plausibility function.

r(s|)

r(,m) (s) =
+ r(s|)
6
conditionalization r -part R together -part shifted appropriately.
show conditionalization easily represented taking minimal sums
plausibility functions.
Definition 13 Let r plausibility function 2F , let non-empty subset 2F ,
let natural number. Define rC (, m) follows:

0

rC (, m) (s) =
+ min() 6
refer rC (, m) conditionalizer r respect m. following
proposition illustrates define conditionalization plausibility function
taking appropriate sum.
Proposition 10 Let r plausibility function minr = 0. , m, normalization r + rC (, m) conditionalization r(,m) .
Proof ,
r(s) + rC (, m)(s) = r(s) + 0 = r(s).
809

fiHunter & Delgrande

6 ,
r(s) + rC (, m)(s) = r(s) + + min().
Since r(s) 0 0, follows minimum value obtained r + rC (, m)
min(). Hence, normalization r + rC (, m) plausibility function r0 defined
follows.
r0 (s) = r(s) + rC (, m)(s) min()
equal r(,m) , wanted show.
Proposition 10 illustrates conditionalization r (, m) defined
taking minimal sum two plausibility functions. restricted attention
plausibility functions minimum 0 class coincides closely Spohns
ranking functions. However, define conditionalizer manner
plausibility functions non-zero minimums. define conditionalization
graded world view. Informally, simply conditionalize associated plausibility
function states. Hence, identify conditionalization respect h, mi
following operation:
hACT, OBSi h, plaus stateC (, m)i.
straightforward show gives desired result.
5.3 Representing Belief Evolution Operators
noted previously, previously defined so-called belief evolution operators capture iterated belief change due actions observations (Hunter & Delgrande, 2011).
section, show graded world views actually extend approach, verifying
every belief evolution operator captured graded world view.
two underlying assumptions definition belief evolution:
1. plausibility observation determined ordering, recency default.
2. action history assumed correct.
assumptions represented graded world view setting
plausibility functions appropriately.
Belief evolution operators defined respect metric transition systems.
metric transition system transition system, along metric gives distance
states. metric defines belief revision operator follows (Delgrande, 2004):
= {w | v1 v2 , v3 K
d(w, v1 ) d(v2 , v3 )}.
Assume fixed initial belief state , along metric transition system
defining revision operator update operator . Let belief evolution
operator obtained . Let
= hA1 , . . . ,
810

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

action trajectory, let
= h1 , . . . , n
observation trajectory. want construct graded world view Wev assigns
minimal plausibility value histories corresponding hA, i.
define Wev = hACT, OBSi presently. combining metric given
metric transition system, define plausibility function BASE represents
initial ordering states implicit . particular, s, set
BASE(s) = min({d(s, k) | k }).
Using plausibility function, define observation trajectory OBS. Let max
denote maximum value obtained BASE.

BASE
= 0
OBSi =
(2i + max) otherwise
incrementing plausibility false observations exponentially, assure
recent observations given greater credence.
Informally, action symbol Ai translated plausibility function obtains
minimum value set {Ai }. Formally, following, 1 n:
ACTi = Ai (2n+1 + max).
Proposition 11 hA, = h0 , . . . , n i,
h (Wev )

h = hs0 , A1 , . . . , , sn si i.
Proof Assume moment hA, consistent. Let h = hv0 , B1 , . . . , Bn , vn i.
definition h (Wev ) sum
n
X

ACTi (Bi ) +

i=1

n
X

OBSi (vi )

(2)

i=0

minimal. Since hA, consistent, exist histories hs0 , A1 , . . . , , sn
si . histories, sum (2) becomes
n
X

ACTi (Ai ) +

i=1

n
X

OBSi (si ) = 0 + OBS0 (s0 )

i=0

remark sum less sum obtained history
either Bi Ai si 6 . Therefore h (Wev )
following three conditions hold:
1. Bi = Ai > 0
811

fiHunter & Delgrande

2. vi > 0
3. OBS0 (v0 ) minimal among states satisfying 1 2.
order satisfy condition 2, must case v0 set
\
V =
i1 (Ai ).


order simultaneously satisfy condition 3, must case v0 minimally
distant according metric d. words, v0 V . Therefore, h
(Wev ) Bi = Ai following conditions hold:

1. v0 i1 (Ai ),
2. vi = v0 Ai .
definition hA, i, completes proof.
case hA, inconsistent similar. difference need
notice degree strength observation increases power 2.
use fact that, natural number p, 2p larger every sum terms 2i
< p. such, order minimize sum (2), need work backwards
observations, keeping observation consistent observations followed.
equivalent specification (Wev ) increasing powers exponentially forces
strict preference recent observations.
Proposition 11 demonstrates graded world views represent belief evolution
operator defined respect distance function. perspective graded world
views, assumption action histories infallible essentially restriction
admissible plausibility functions.
conclude section brief remarks use orderings resolve
inconsistency iterated belief change. well-known Darwiche-Pearl postulates iterated belief change (Darwiche & Pearl, 1997) satisfied assume
recent observation takes precedence previous observations. contrast, Papini
illustrates alternative approach iterated revision earlier observations take
precedence later observations (Papini, 2001). generally, defined belief evolution operators respect arbitrary total ordering observations.
natural extension belief evolution would extend ordering include observations
actions. Using techniques section, easy see extended conception belief evolution corresponds class graded world views arbitrary
initial observation followed plausibility functions form 2i , distinct. Hence, even general extension belief evolution represented
relatively restricted class graded world views.
5.4 Relation Situation Calculus
Situation Calculus (SitCalc) well-establishing framework reasoning
effects actions. Action descriptions SitCalc formulated many-sorted firstorder logic along single second-order induction axiom. Briefly, variables range
812

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

situations, entities, actions. Situations understood represent current
state world, including complete history actions occurred.
distinguished constant symbol S0 denotes initial situation distinguished
function symbol maps action situation situation results
executing situation s. Predicate symbols take situation argument
called fluents. detailed introduction, refer reader foundational summary
presented Levesque, Pirri Reiter (1998).
epistemic extension SitCalc introduces sensing actions, alternative initial
situations, accessibility relation, plausibility ordering situations (Shapiro
et al., 2011). situations agent believes possible minimal accessible
situations, effect sensing action changes set accessible states.
results form belief revision satisfies AGM postulates.
previously proved belief revision SitCalc captured belief evolution
operator natural translation (Hunter & Delgrande, 2011); therefore follows
Proposition 11 belief change operators defined standard SitCalc approach
captured graded world views.
similar conclusion drawn regarding representation uncertain actions.
Bacchus et. al. (1999) extend SitCalc include noisy sensors non-deterministic
actions. Roughly, idea define complex actions terms set primitive
actions. manner, non-deterministic action represented probability function
set primitive actions. similar result Proposition 5, proves
capture non-deterministic actions introducing ranking functions action
effects. think action effect primitive action, essentially
representation Bacchus et. al. except use ranking functions rather
probabilities. Moreover, section 3.4 demonstrated translation probabilities
plausibilities straightforward.
approach appears sufficiently general capture belief change
uncertainty actions defined given epistemic extensions SitCalc,
important note respects approach actually expressive.
particular, allow revision arbitrary rankings formulas; require
fixed set sensing actions. approach allows flexible representation
interaction uncertainty actions observations, elaboration
tolerant sense need modify aggregates plausibility functions
capture different phenomena. hand, SitCalc provides rigorous
precise treatment actions effects ontic change. example, SitCalc treatment
property persistence (Kelly & Pearce, 2010) captures natural feature certain world
properties captured graded world view ad hoc restriction
plausibility functions. Overall, see approach high-level model belief change
capture dynamics belief SitCalc, losing
advantages SitCalc model action effects.
5.5 Relation Dynamic Epistemic Logic
notion belief change due reported information addressed Dynamic
Epistemic Logic (DEL) (van Ditmarsch, van der Hoek, & Kooi, 2007). context, belief
813

fiHunter & Delgrande

change captured plausibility models. plausibility model Kripke structure,
associate well-ordering possible states state; ordering indicates states seen plausible state structure. Belief update
captured setting state-changing actions allow different agents
different awareness action executed (Baltag & Smets, 2008); belief
revision captured mapping plausibility models syntactically defined
suitable modal operators (Baltag & Smets, 2006; Van Benthem, 2007). Although
common use ordering represent plausibility DEL, variants
plausibility captured quantitative values. example, Laverny Lang
(2005) define logic incorporates actions uses ranking functions N {}
model strength belief formulas without nested modalities.
two main distinctions work related work DEL tradition. first distinction superficial, related high-level perspective new
information. DEL, external perspective new information, structures explicitly model way agent system views new information.
DEL expressive respect nested multi-agent beliefs: able
explicit perspective agent. presented paper, think
graded world views taking internal perspective single agent. provide
ranking function represents observation, external knowledge
actual state world. advantage approach every observation (resp.
action) always possible. contrast, external perspective DEL, may
situations certain information simply cannot provided information update.
example, underlying Kripke structure contains states true,
information update provided make agent believe false.
second distinction work existing work DEL related
uniform representation observations actions. DEL, distinction often drawn
so-called hard updates soft updates (Van Benthem, 2007). hard update
occurs information definite sense, incorporated modifying
accessible states. might occur, example, common knowledge
certain state-changing action occurred. soft update corresponds belief revision,
information incorporated modifying plausbility ordering. However,
practical setting, often case one distinguish kind change
actually occur. kind ambiguity occur case graded world views,
belief change operations handled uniform manner taking aggregates
plausibility functions. Morever, hard update soft update, update typically
single piece information single level plausibility. Hence, observations
actions represented graded manner. one distinguishing features
present work: allow observations (and actions) provide different levels evidence
several different states simultaneously.
Despite differences, important emphasize actually see graded
world views alternative DEL. Instead, see approach presented tool
could used basis belief change suitably defined DEL quantitative
plausibility rankings. analogous way formal belief change operators
incorporated modal logics. Iterated revision operators lexicographic revision
(Nayak, 1994) natural revision (Boutilier, 1996) originally defined general
814

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

setting orderings, used motivating examples information update
DEL. Similarly, suggest modal logic could defined semantics
iterated propositional updates based aggregates plausibility functions.
logic would able model practical domains discussed paper,
would able capture complex multi-agent situations involving nested belief.
5.6 Representations Plausibility
Following Spohn (1988), taken quantitative ranking functions representation
plausibility. However, literature belief change defeasible reasoning contains
great deal work different representations plausibility. section, briefly
consider alternative approaches literature, argue approach
suitable kind reasoning intend capture.
basic representation plausibility literature total pre-order
states, often see AGM-inspired work. normally think ordering
terms series levels plausibility. obvious limitation approach
notion magnitude respect differences plausibility, although
introduced allowing empty levels. event, clear ranking
functions expressive total pre-orders respect modelling plausibility.
interesting distinction occurs notion plausibility, orderings
used DEL tradition. noted above, plausibility context typically captured
well-ordering (Van Benthem, 2007). necessary because, setting,
want states comparable; want certain states innaccessible
others. One might ask ranking functions limited sense respect
well-orderings used plausibility models. choice ranking functions motivated
internal-external distinction discussed previous section. individual agent need
consider impossible states order modify beliefs appropriately, need
consider highly unlikely states.
Note approach superficially similar related work defeasible reasoning
featuring form preferential ordering states. possible, example, reason
typicality supplementing Kripke structure single ordering states
(Britz & Varzinczak, 2013). alternative model setting description logics
proposed, function introduced map concept set elements
deemed typical (Giordano, Olivetti, Gliozzi, & Pozzato, 2013). However,
despite superficial similarities, important clear initial plausibility
function intended representation typicality normality absolute
sense. model plausibility corresponds closely pointed plausibility model
includes distinguished actual state.
Alternative quantitative models plausibility explored literature.
One influential approaches based possibility measures,
functions map states [0, 1] (Benferhat et al., 1999). main difference
possibility measure plausibility function really possibility measure 0 actually corresponds impossibility, corresponding plausibility value. However,
already shown plausibility functions used capture rational-valued
815

fiHunter & Delgrande

functions [0,1]; would straightforward modify proof deal real number
values.
One general measures plausibility literature plausibility space,
analogous probability space except range plausibility values
set (Friedman & Halpern, 2001). Plausibility spaces intended
general model subsumes great deal existing work reasoning plausibility.
Indeed, plausibility functions clearly special case plausibility space;
representation belief seen special case general approach.
section, restricting discussion alternative representations
plausibility states. noted previously, approach representation plausibility
states actually new therefore easy position work context.
novel feature approach use notion plausibiility actions,
order develop novel approach reasoning iterated belief change due actions
observations

6. Limitations Advantages
focus previous sections establishing expressive power graded
world views, compared existing frameworks reasoning belief change.
result, focused problems involving priori graded world view, along
new information. However, restriction new information artificial.
general case, reason restrict attention problems agent
receives information actions observations occurring recent point
time. agent could certainly receive new information earlier events actions.
Hence, general problem involves agent underlying graded world view,
together set constraints plausible histories. section, consider
representation problems general form.
6.1 Constrained World Views
Suppose hACT, OBSi graded world view length n. action constraint
pair (A, i) action symbol n. Define (hACT, OBSi) (A, i)
set histories minimal plausibility, subject restriction ith
action executed A. define observation constraints analogous manner,
let (hACT, OBSi) (, i) set minimally ranked histories ith state
. set constraints, define (hACT, OBSi) set
minimally ranked histories satisfying every constraint . refer histories
constrained histories refer graded world view together set
constraints constrained world view.
presented constrained world views illustrate graded world views
useful many problems beyond normally considered realm
standard belief change operator. example, suppose Bob sends encrypted
email message Alice, inviting party house. Bob aware Eve
system administrator, could potentially manipulate message
delivering it. Alice show up, Bob concludes Eve deliver
message. Bob concerned Eve read message hurt feelings
816

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

invited. However, looking every possible action Eve could take, Bob concludes
Eve could decrypted message.
preceding example, Bob needs consider possible actions Eve could
executed. conclusion Bob draws Eves knowledge party invariant
respect actions. formally define invariance follows.
Definition 14 Let hACT, OBSi graded world view. say set states
i-invariant hACT, OBSi if, every A, Bel(hACT, OBSi (A, i)) .
intuition behind i-invariance that, regardless action time i, underlying
agent always believe actual world . Reasoning invariant properties
essential agent trying ensure property must hold action domain
involving exogenous actions. required, example, reasoning cryptographic
protocols.
Reasoning invariance one new kind problem addressed
constrained world views. suggest constraints used provide natural
representations hypothetical reasoning abductive reasoning.
6.2 Belief Extrapolation
Constrained world views similar belief extrapolation operators (Dupin de Saint-Cyr
& Lang, 2011). Briefly, belief extrapolation operator l takes sequence formulas,
called scenario input, outputs another scenario. intuition output
gives general sequence formulas possibly true, given input
assumption fluents tend inertial. give brief description basic
construction.
trajectory sequence interpretations fixed signature. Let (i) denote
ith interpretation trajectory . Given scenario , let Traj () denote set
trajectories satisfy formula point-by-point basis. Every ordering
class trajectories defines extrapolation operator l follows:
|( l (t))| = { (t) | Min(, Traj ())}
Hence, l picks minimal trajectories satisfying .
present purposes, important feature belief extrapolation operator
defined respect ordering histories. Given ordering
histories together sequence formulas, belief extrapolation operator returns
plausible sequences states. case constrained world views, essentially
thing. given graded world view defines ordering states,
constraints give sequence conditions need satisfied. easy show
that, using summation aggregate, every graded world view captured belief
extrapolation operator. section, consider converse problem: every belief
extrapolation operator represented suitable graded world view?
key observation mapping graded world views orderings
histories surjective; orderings histories described
graded world view. example, graded world view explicitly capture
plausibilities form A1 occurs time i, A2 likely occur time + 1.
817

fiHunter & Delgrande

easy see, graded world view ranks histories combining sequence
rankings instant. course, might possible devise sequence rankings
along aggregate function happened support conditional plausibility
fixed action signature. would domain-specific property, temporal
relation actions expressed two independent plausibility functions.
Informally, graded world view represent domains ordering histories
built pointwise manner plausibilities point time. section,
use limitation establish difference expressive power constrained
world views belief extrapolation operators.
First, need formalize problem would address precisely.
Given belief extrapolation operator, would able find graded world view
captures information.
Definition 15 Let l belief extrapolation operator. say l representable
graded world view hACT, OBSi that, every scenario length n,
Traj ( l) = (hACT, OBSi) .
l representable, behaviour l simulated graded world view.
remark abused notation definition Traj ( l) collection
sequences states, whereas (hACT, OBSi) collection histories. interpret
equality mean two collections equal ignore action symbols
latter.
following proposition indicates belief extrapolation operators expressive advantage.
Proposition 12 belief extrapolation operator l representable.
Proof Let ordering following trajectories minimal.
1. h{a, b}, {a, b}, {a, b}i
2. h{a, b}, {a, b}, {a, b}i
3. h{a, b}, {a, b}, {a, b}i
Let l associated belief extrapolation operator. show l representable.
Let = ha, b, bi. Note satisfied three minimal trajectories. Therefore
raj( l) precisely set minimal trajectories.
suppose hACT, OBSi graded world view
hACT, OBSi
assigns minimal plausibility 1, 2, 3. Hence, exist actions A1 , A2 , A3 , B1 , B2 , B3
following sums obtain minimum possible rank:
1. OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A1 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B1 ) + OBS2 ({a, b})
2. OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A2 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B2 ) + OBS2 ({a, b})
818

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

3. OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A3 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B3 ) + OBS2 ({a, b})
must case ACT1 (A1 ) = ACT1 (A2 ), otherwise either 1 2 could
reduced changing first action. Similarly, must case ACT2 (B1 ) =
ACT2 (B3 ), otherwise either 1 3 would minimal. So, rewrite
sums follows:
1. OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A1 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B1 ) + OBS2 ({a, b})
2. OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A1 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B2 ) + OBS2 ({a, b})
3. OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A3 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B1 ) + OBS2 ({a, b})
1 2, follows basic algebra
ACT2 (B1 ) + OBS2 ({a, b}) = ACT2 (B2 ) + OBS2 ({a, b}).
Substituting 3 gives another minimal sum:
OBS0 ({a, b}) + ACT1 (A3 ) + OBS1 ({a, b}) + ACT2 (B2 ) + OBS2 ({a, b}).
corresponds trajectory
h{a, b}, {a, b}, {a, b}i.
Hence, graded world view assigning minimum plausibility 1-3, must assign
minimum plausibility fourth trajectory. Informally, 1-3 preferred trajectories
according graded world view, forced accept another preferred trajectory.
already saw raj( l) consists 1-3. Therefore l representable.

Note proof Proposition 12 constructive demonstrates
simple, concrete, extrapolation operator representable.
Informally, Proposition 12 follows fact orderings histories
defined graded world view. particularly important applications
agent preferences order events occur. applications,
useful assign plausibilities certain sequences actions. suggest, however,
class orderings definable graded world views natural class orderings.
particular, many action domains agent preconceived assumptions
order exogenous actions occur. Graded world views provide reasonable tool representation action domains. Graded world views
expressive advantage explicitly represent fallible actions well
forms uncertainty action effects.
seen represent every belief extrapolation operator,
would mistake conclude graded world views strictly less expressive. Belief
extrapolation really says nothing explicit actions, leads several differences
approach. Given ordering histories length n, clear use
belief extrapoloation incorporate new action followed new observation;
fixed method extending orderings n-tuples orderings n + 1 tuples.
819

fiHunter & Delgrande

case graded world view, however, clear new ordering defined
actions performed. such, graded world views appropriate
representation epistemic action domains expect new observations actions
occur. course, approach, fixed length initial graded world
view. Since null actions, however, value n really maximum length
sequence actions occurred. such, graded world views sensible domains
imagine maximum number actions previously occurred
bounded. Again, suggest class domains satisfies constraint
large natural.
6.3 Beliefs Action Effects
Despite flexible representation observations actions, one aspect
representation quite rigid. Specifically, single underlying transition system
gives effects actions; mechanism changing transition system
response new information. addressed Varzinczak (2010) modal
setting, introducing formal mechanism allows effects actions change
response new information. Combining idea notion plausibility graded
world view would give even complete picture way agents reason
effects actions uncertain effects. leave treatment idea future
work.
related problem fact underlying transition system framework
essentially known agent. words, given perfect information
current state world action executed, agent knows
resulting state. alternative approach due Eiter et al. (2010) start
action description specifies actions effects. introduce suitable
information update mechanisms based (partial) description effects, rather
assuming definite underlying transition system. is, however, superficial
distinction. using effect ranking functions, essentially give partial description
action effects corresponds action description. manner, straightforward
define so-called Action Description Update problems graded world views.

7. Conclusion
introduced formalism reasoning sequences actions observations.
formalism uses Spohn-style ranking functions instant determine
plausible action observation, determines plausible histories aggregate
function instants. proved formalism subsumes belief revision,
belief evolution, conditionalization. Moreover, suitable representation
fallible beliefs, erroneous perception, exogenous actions, failed actions. used
transition systems representation actions order facilitate comparison
wide range action formalisms. future work, interested axiomatizing
belief change permitted class admissible aggregate functions.
main advantage graded world views related formalisms graded world
views provide uniform mechanism dealing imperfect information actions
observations. such, graded world views allow observations need incor820

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

porated agent convinced certain action occurred previously.
hand, graded world views allow agent retract belief action occurred
strong belief observation. Graded world views provide tool representing opposing conclusions, simply considering magnitudes plausibilities,
well underlying aggregate.
existing work, belief change caused actions often represented starting
action formalism adding revision operators. One problem approach
allow beliefs action occurrences. sense, graded world views
take opposite approach. start ranking functions, originally defined
reasoning belief change static environment, plug actions.
agents beliefs actions occur independent formal representation
action effects. such, although presented graded world views terms
transition systems, would certainly possible use different action formalism.
key point that, using ranking functions represent uncertainty states
actions, define framework reasoning epistemic action effects
primary importance placed evolution agents beliefs.
conclude brief remark overall approach taken framework.
distinction commonly drawn update revision belief change literature,
despite fact difficult practice determine appropriate
operation given particular piece information. many cases, simply clear
conflicting information result unseen action result erroneous
beliefs. One solution problem define single, general belief change operation
subsumes (Kern-Isberner, 2008). contrasat, maintain explicit distinction
way beliefs change due actions observations, use uniform model
uncertainty agent level focuses finding plausible sequence events
explain available evidence. seems natural approach many applications,
agents perception past events likely influenced conviction
respect senses beliefs.

References
Alchourron, C., Gardenfors, P., & Makinson, D. (1985). logic theory change:
Partial meet functions contraction revision. Journal Symbolic Logic, 50 (2),
510530.
Bacchus, F., Halpern, J., & Levesque, H. (1999). Reasoning noisy sensors effectors
situation calculus. Artificial Intelligence, 111 (1-2), 171208.
Baltag, A., & Smets, S. (2006). Dynamic belief revision multi-agent plausibility models.
Proceedings Logic Foundations Game Decision Theory (LOFT),
pp. 1124.
Baltag, A., & Smets, S. (2008). qualitative theory dynamic interactive belief revision.
Proceedings Logic Foundations Game Decision Theory (LOFT).
Benferhat, S., Dubois, D., & Prade, H. (1999). Possibilistic standard probabilistic
semantics conditional knowledge bases. Journal Logic Computation, 9 (6),
873895.
821

fiHunter & Delgrande

Boutilier, C. (1995). Generalized update: Belief change dynamic settings. Proceedings
Fourteenth International Joint Conference Artificial Intelligence (IJCAI
1995), pp. 15501556.
Boutilier, C. (1996). Iterated revision minimal change conditional beliefs. Journal
Philosophical Logic, 25, 263305.
Britz, K., & Varzinczak, I. (2013). Defeasible modalities. Proceedings 14th Conference Theoretical Aspects Rationality Knowledge (TARK), pp. 4960.
Darwiche, A., & Pearl, J. (1997). logic iterated belief revision. Artificial Intelligence, 89 (1-2), 129.
Delgrande, J. (2004). Preliminary considerations modelling belief change operators metric spaces. Proceedings 10th International Workshop NonMonotonic Reasoning (NMR 2004), pp. 118125.
Delgrande, J., Dubois, D., & Lang, J. (2006). Iterated revision prioritized merging.
Proceedings 10th International Conference Principles Knowledge Representation Reasoning (KR2006).
Delgrande, J., & Levesque, H. (2012). Belief revision sensing fallible actions.
Thirteenth International Conference Principles Knowledge Representation
Reasoning (KR2012), pp. 148157.
Dupin de Saint-Cyr, F., & Lang, J. (2011). Belief extrapolation (or reason
observations unpredicted change). Artificial Intelligence, 2, 760790.
Eiter, T., Erdem, E., Fink, M., & Senko, J. (2010). Updating action domain descriptions.
Artificial Intelligence, 174 (15), 11721221.
Friedman, N., & Halpern, J. (2001). Plausibility measures default reasoning. Journal
ACM, 48 (4), 648685.
Gelfond, M., & Lifschitz, V. (1998). Action languages. Linkoping Electronic Articles
Computer Information Science, 3 (16), 116.
Giordano, L., Olivetti, N., Gliozzi, V., & Pozzato, G. (2013). non-monotonic description
logic reasoning typicality. Artificial Intelligence, 195, 165202.
Grove, A. (1988). Two modellings theory change. Journal Philosophical Logic, 17,
157170.
Hunter, A. (2014). Belief change non-deterministic actions. Proceedings
Canadian Conference Artificial Intelligence, pp. 289294.
Hunter, A., & Booth, R. (2015). Trust-sensitive belief revision. Proceedings
International Joint Conference Artificial Intelligence (IJCAI15).
Hunter, A., & Delgrande, J. (2006). Belief change context fallible actions observations. Proceedings National Conference Artificial Intelligence(AAAI06),
pp. 257262.
Hunter, A., & Delgrande, J. (2011). Iterated belief change due actions observations.
Journal Artificial Intelligence Research (JAIR), 40, 269304.
822

fiBelief Change Uncertain Action Histories

Jin, Y., & Thielscher, M. (2004). Representing beliefs fluent calculus. Proceedings
European Conference Artificial Intelligence(ECAI04).
Katsuno, H., & Mendelzon, A. (1991). difference updating knowledge base
revising it. Proceedings Second International Conference Principles
Knowledge Representation Reasoning (KR 1991), pp. 387394.
Katsuno, H., & Mendelzon, A. (1992). difference updating knowledge
base revising it. G ardenfors, P. (Ed.), Belief Revision, pp. 183203. Cambridge
University Press.
Kelly, R., & Pearce, A. (2010). Property persistence situation calculus. Artificial
Intelligence, 174 (12-13), 865888.
Kern-Isberner, G. (2008). Linking iterated belief change operations nonmonotonic reasoning. Proceedings Eleventh International Conference Principles
Knowledge Representation Reasoning (KR08), pp. 166176.
Kraus, S., Lehmann, D., & Magidor, M. (1990). Nonmonotonic reasoning, preferential
models cumulative logics. Artificial Intelligence, 4, 167207.
Laverny, N., & Lang, J. (2005). knowledge-based programs graded belief-based
programs, part i: On-line reasoning. Synthese, 147 (2), 277321.
Lehmann, D., & Magidor, M. (1992). conditional knowledge base entail?.
Artificial Intelligence, 55, 160.
Levesque, H., Pirri, F., & Reiter, R. (1998). Foundations situation calculus.
Linkoping Electronic Articles Computer Information Science, 3 (18), 118.
Liberatore, P., & Schaerf, M. (2000). BReLS: system integration knowledge
bases. Proceedings KR2000, pp. 145152. Morgan Kaufmann Publishers.
Lorini, E., Jiang, G., & Perrussel, L. (2014). Trust-based belief change. ECAI 2014 21st European Conference Artificial Intelligence, pp. 549554.
Moore, R. (1985). formal theory knowledge action. Hobbs, J., & Moore, R.
(Eds.), Formal Theories Commonsense World, pp. 319358. Ablex Publishing.
Nayak, A. (1994). Iterated belief change based epistemic entrenchment. Erkenntnis, 41,
353390.
Papini, O. (2001). Iterated revision operations stemming history agents
observations. Rott, H., & Williams, M. (Eds.), Frontiers Belief Revision, pp.
279301. Kluwer Academic Publishers.
Shapiro, S., Pagnucco, M., Lesperance, Y., & Levesque, H. (2011). Iterated belief change
situation calculus. Artificial Intelligence, 175 (1), 165192.
Spohn, W. (1988). Ordinal conditional functions. dynamic theory epistemic states.
Harper, W., & Skyrms, B. (Eds.), Causation Decision, Belief Change, Statistics, vol. II, pp. 105134. Kluwer Academic Publishers.
Van Benthem, J. (2007). Dynamic logic belief revision. Journal applied non-classical
logics, 17 (2), 129155.
823

fiHunter & Delgrande

van Ditmarsch, H., van der Hoek, W., & Kooi, B. (2007). Dynamic Epistemic Logic.
Springer.
Varzinczak, I. (2010). action theory change. Journal Artificial Intelligence Research
(JAIR), 37, 189246.

824


